es: Equipo compatible: Esquís alpinos; Esquís de travesía; Esquís de fondo; Esquís freeride; Esquís de salto; Tablas de snowboard; Esquís anchos; Otro
nb: Kompatibelt utstyr: Alpinski; Fjellski; Langrennsski; Frikjøringsski; Hoppski; Snøbrett; Brede ski; Annet
sl-SI: Združljiva oprema: Alpske smuči; Turne smuči; Tekaške smuči; Freeride smuči; Skakalne smuči; Snežne deske; Široke smuči; Drugo
it: Attrezzatura compatibile: Sci alpino; Sci da alpinismo; Sci di fondo; Sci freeride; Sci per salto; Snowboard; Sci larghi; Altro
ro-RO: Echipament compatibil: Schiuri alpine; Schiuri de tură; Schiuri de fond; Schiuri freeride; Schiuri pentru sărituri; Snowboarduri; Schiuri late; Altele
nl: Compatibele apparatuur: Alpineski's; Backcountry-ski's; Langlaufski's; Freeride-ski's; Springski's; Snowboards; Brede ski's; Overig
hu: Kompatibilis felszerelés: Alpesi sílécek; Túrasílécek; Sífutó lécek; Freeride sílécek; Ugrólécek; Snowboardok; Széles sílécek; Egyéb
el: Συμβατός εξοπλισμός: Σκι αλπικού τύπου; Σκι backcountry; Σκι αντοχής (cross-country); Σκι freeride; Σκι αλμάτων; Snowboard; Φαρδιά σκι; Άλλο
de: Kompatible Ausrüstung: Alpinski; Backcountry-Ski; Langlaufski; Freeride-Ski; Sprungski; Snowboards; Breite Ski; Sonstige
cs: Kompatibilní zařízení: Sjezdové lyže; Backcountry lyže; Běžecké lyže; Freeride lyže; Skokanské lyže; Snowboardy; Široké lyže; Jiné
da: Kompatibelt udstyr: Alpinski; Backcountry-ski; Langrendsski; Freeride-ski; Hoppeski; Snowboards; Brede ski; Andet
lt-LT: Suderinama įranga: Kalnų slidės; „Backcountry“ slidės; Lygumų slidės; Laisvojo stiliaus („freeride“) slidės; Šuolių slidės; Snieglentės; Plačios slidės; Kita
pl: Zgodne wyposażenie: Narty zjazdowe; Narty skiturowe; Narty biegowe; Narty freeridowe; Narty do skoków; Snowboardy; Szerokie narty; Inne
tr: Uyumlu ekipman: Alp disiplini kayak; Tur kayağı; Kros kayağı; Freeride kayak; Atlama kayağı; Snowboard; Geniş kayak; Diğer
bg-BG: Съвместимо оборудване: Алпийски ски; Ски за извънпистово каране; Ски за бягане; Фрийрайд ски; Ски за скокове; Сноубордове; Широки ски; Друго
pt-BR: Equipamento compatível: Esquis alpinos; Esquis backcountry; Esquis cross-country; Esquis freeride; Esquis de salto; Snowboards; Esquis largos; Outro
ko: 호환 장비: 알파인 스키; 백컨트리 스키; 크로스컨트리 스키; 프리라이드 스키; 점프 스키; 스노보드; 와이드 스키; 기타
hr-HR: Kompatibilna oprema: Alpske skije; Turne skije; Skije za skijaško trčanje; Freeride skije; Skije za skokove; Snowboardi; Široke skije; Ostalo
ru: Совместимое оборудование: Горные лыжи; Лыжи для бэккантри; Беговые лыжи; Лыжи для фрирайда; Прыжковые лыжи; Сноуборды; Широкие лыжи; Другое
zh-TW: 相容設備: 高山滑雪板; 偏野滑雪板; 越野滑雪板; 自由滑雪板; 跳台滑雪板; 單板滑雪板; 寬型滑雪板; 其他
sv: Kompatibel utrustning: Alpinskidor; Turskidor; Längdskidor; Freeride-skidor; Hoppskidor; Snowboards; Breda skidor; Annat
fi: Yhteensopivat laitteet: Laskettelusukset; Tunturisukset; Maastohiihtosukset; Vapaalaskusukset; Mäkihyppysukset; Lumilaudat; Leveät sukset; Muu
zh-CN: 适用装备: 高山滑雪板; 野雪滑雪板; 越野滑雪板; 自由滑雪板; 跳台滑雪板; 单板滑雪板; 宽型滑雪板; 其他
en: Compatible equipment: Alpine skis; Backcountry Skis; Cross-country skis; Freeride skis; Jump skis; Snowboards; Wide skis; Other
ja: 対応機器: アルペンスキー; バックカントリースキー; クロスカントリースキー; フリーライドスキー; ジャンプスキー; スノーボード; ワイドスキー; その他
pt-PT: Equipamento compatível: Esquis alpinos; Esquis de montanha; Esquis de fundo; Esquis de freeride; Esquis de saltos; Snowboards; Esquis largos; Outro
sk-SK: Kompatibilné zariadenie: Zjazdové lyže; Skialpinistické lyže; Bežecké lyže; Freeride lyže; Skokanské lyže; Snowboardy; Široké lyže; Iné
th: อุปกรณ์ที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: สกีอัลไพน์; สกีแบ็กคันทรี; สกีครอสคันทรี; สกีฟรีไรด์; สกีกระโดด; สโนว์บอร์ด; สกีหน้ากว้าง; อื่นๆ
fr: Compatible equipment: Skis alpins; Skis de randonnée; Skis de fond; Skis freeride; Skis de saut; Planches à neige; Skis larges; Autre
vi: Thiết bị tương thích: Ván trượt tuyết Alpine; Ván trượt tuyết Backcountry; Ván trượt tuyết băng đồng; Ván trượt tuyết Freeride; Ván trượt tuyết nhảy xa; Ván trượt tuyết (snowboard); Ván trượt tuyết bản rộng; Khác